Odia_apertium_morph_dict.dix
<pardef n="/yA__v">
<e><p><l>yAe</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAu</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAu</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAa</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAa</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Anwi</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAe</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAAnwi</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAAnwi</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuCi</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuCu</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuCu</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuCa</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuCa</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuCanwi</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuCi</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuCanwi</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuCanwi</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiCi</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiCu</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiCu</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiCa</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiCa</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiCanwi</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiCi</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiCanwi</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiCanwi</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gali</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>galu</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>galu</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gala</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gala</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gale</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>galA</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gale</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gale</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWili</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWilu</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWilu</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWila</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWila</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWile</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWilA</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWile</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWile</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiWili</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiWilu</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiWilu</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiWila</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiWila</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiWile</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiWilA</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiWile</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAiWile</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yibi</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yibu</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yibu</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yiba</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yiba</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yibe</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yiba</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yibe</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yibe</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWibi</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWibu</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWibu</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWiba</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWiba</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWibe</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWiba</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAuWibe</l><r>yA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="yA"><i></i><par n="/yA__v"/></e>
